Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-555
Class I, II, or III school district; board of education; meetings; when held.

The regular meetings of the board of education of a Class I, II, or III school district shall be held as provided in section 79-554. Special meetings may be held as circumstances may demand, and all meetings of the board shall be open to the public.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XIV, § 6, p. 379;

R.S.1913, § 6953;

C.S.1922, § 6587;

C.S.1929, § 79-2506;

R.S.1943, § 79-2508;

Laws 1947, c. 291, § 1, p. 903;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 238, p. 770;

Laws 1961, c. 402, § 2, p. 1218;

Laws 1965, c. 525, § 1, p. 1656;

Laws 1972, LB 1268, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 892, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-805;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 308;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 46.